Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4720.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-4720 to 71-4732.01:

(1) Commission means Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing;

(2) Deaf means a hearing impairment, with or without amplification, which is so severe that the person with the impairment may have difficulty in auditorily processing spoken language without the use of an interpreter;

(3) Hard of hearing means a hearing loss, permanent or fluctuating, which may adversely affect the ability to understand spoken language without the use of an interpreter or auxiliary aid; and

(4) Licensed interpreter has the same meaning as in section 20-151.

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 334, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 14.